District of Columbia statutes.
23-1501

Definitions.

As used in this chapter —

(1)

The term “witness” includes a person whose testimony is desired in any proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in a criminal action, prosecution, or proceeding.

(2)

The term “State” includes the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, the Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, and any other territory or possession of the United States.

(3)

The term “summons” includes a subpoena, order, or other notice requiring the appearance of a witness.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 650, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
1981 Ed., § 23-1501.
1973 Ed., § 23-1501.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses from Without a State in Criminal Proceedings.